Utah statutes.
17-53-302.   County executive duties.

Each county executive shall:

(1)  exercise supervisory control over all functions of the executive branch of county government;

(2)  direct and organize the management of the county in a manner consistent with state law, county ordinance, and the county's optional plan of county government;

(3)  carry out programs and policies established by the county legislative body;

(4)  faithfully ensure compliance with all applicable laws and county ordinances;

(5)  exercise supervisory and coordinating control over all departments of county government;

(6)  except as otherwise vested in the county legislative body by state law or by the optional plan of county government, appoint, suspend, and remove the directors of all county departments and all appointive officers of boards and commissions;

(7)  except as otherwise delegated by statute to another county officer, exercise administrative and auditing control over all funds and assets, tangible and intangible, of the county;

(8)  except as otherwise delegated by statute to another county officer, supervise and direct centralized budgeting, accounting, personnel management, purchasing, and other service functions of the county;

(9)  conduct planning studies and make recommendations to the county legislative body relating to financial, administrative, procedural, and operational plans, programs, and improvements in county government;

(10)  maintain a continuing review of expenditures and of the effectiveness of departmental budgetary controls;

(11)  develop systems and procedures, not inconsistent with statute, for planning, programming, budgeting, and accounting for all activities of the county;

(12)  if the county executive is an elected county executive, exercise a power of veto over ordinances enacted by the county legislative body, including an item veto upon budget appropriations, in the manner provided by the optional plan of county government;

(13)  review, negotiate, approve, and execute contracts for the county, unless otherwise provided by statute;

(14)  perform all other functions and duties required of the executive by state law, county ordinance, and the optional plan of county government; and

(15)  sign on behalf of the county all deeds that convey county property.

